New York, session 2025-2026, S6948.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 679-k 2 to read as follows: 3 § 679-k. Senator John J. Marchi government studies scholarship 4 program. 1. Purpose. a. The president shall grant scholarship awards to 5 students of the city university of New York who are enrolled in govern- 6 ment or government related studies. Such awards shall be made on a 7 competitive basis, as promulgated by the corporation through rules and 8 regulations to applicants who are enrolling in an approved program to 9 obtain a degree in government or government related studies from the 10 city university of New York. 11 b. To be eligible for an award pursuant to this subdivision, appli- 12 cants shall (1) be a resident of the state; (2) enroll in a degree 13 program in government or government related studies; (3) attend a city 14 university of New York school; and (4) comply with subdivision five of 15 section six hundred sixty-one of this part. 16 2. Award conditions and requirements. Scholarships shall be awarded on 17 a competitive basis as promulgated by the corporation through rules and 18 regulations to applicants whom the corporation has certified are eligi- 19 ble to receive such awards; and who agree to provide not less than 20 twelve academic credit hours or its equivalent for the duration of at 21 least four years upon completion of the degree program. 22 3. Amount. The corporation shall grant such awards within the amounts 23 appropriated for such purpose and based on availability of funds accord- 24 ing to a schedule to be determined by the corporation in an amount: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11083-01-5 S. 6948 2 1 a. Equal to the tuition charged to state resident students enrolled in 2 a degree program with a major in government or government related 3 studies; the average mandatory fees charged at the city university of 4 New York, or the actual tuition and fees charged to the recipient, 5 whichever is less; and the average non-tuition cost of attendance, as 6 determined by the corporation and as approved by the director of the 7 budget, for a student at the city university of New York or actual non- 8 tuition cost of attendance at such institution, whichever is less, 9 provided that the scholarship shall not exceed an amount that is equal 10 to the total cost of attendance determined for federal Title IV student 11 financial aid purposes, less all other scholarships and grants provided 12 by the state, other states, the federal government or other governments, 13 and the amount of educational benefits paid under any program that would 14 duplicate the purposes of this program, provided that any scholarships 15 or grants provided to a recipient by the institution which are intended 16 to fund any portion of the difference between the annual state award and 17 the actual costs of attendance at any such institution shall not be 18 considered to duplicate the purposes of this program. 19 b. The total cost of the Senator John J. Marchi government studies 20 scholarship program shall not exceed an annual cost of two million 21 dollars, and no annual award shall exceed twenty thousand dollars. 22 4. Other awards. Award recipients shall be eligible to apply for other 23 awards. 24 5. Penalties for noncompliance. a. The corporation shall convert to a 25 student loan the full amount of the award given pursuant to this 26 section, plus interest, according to a schedule to be determined by the 27 corporation if the student fails to receive a degree in government or 28 government related studies. 29 b. The rate of interest charged for repayment of the student loan 30 shall be determined pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the 31 corporation. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.